el: Περιεχόμενα κιτ ενεργοποιητή κλειδαριάς πόρτας οχήματος: Ενεργοποιητής + κλιπ/στοιχεία στερέωσης; Ενεργοποιητής + βάσεις στήριξης; Ενεργοποιητής + μονάδα τηλεχειρισμού/εισόδου χωρίς κλειδί; Ενεργοποιητής + ράβδοι/σύνδεσμοι; Ενεργοποιητής + πλεξούδα καλωδίωσης/pigtail; Μόνο ενεργοποιητής; Πλήρες κιτ εγκατάστασης; Άλλο
sv: Innehåll i sats för fordonsdörrlåsmanöverdon: Aktuator + klämmor/fästelement; Aktuator + monteringsfästen; Aktuator + modul för fjärrkontroll/nyckellös start; Aktuator + stänger/länkage; Aktuator + kablage/kontakt; Endast aktuator; Komplett installationskit; Övrigt
nl: Inhoud van kit met actuatoren voor het autodeurslot: Actuator + clips/bevestigingsmiddelen; Actuator + montagebeugel(s); Actuator + afstandsbediening/keyless module; Actuator + stangen/koppeling; Actuator + kabelboom/pigtail; Alleen actuator; Complete installatiekit; Overig
tr: Araç kapı kilidi aktüatör kit içeriği: Aktüatör + klipsler/bağlantı elemanları; Aktüatör + montaj braketleri; Aktüatör + uzaktan/anahtarsız modül; Aktüatör + çubuklar/bağlantı; Aktüatör + kablo demeti/pigtail; Yalnızca aktüatör; Tam kurulum kiti; Diğer
pt-PT: Conteúdo do kit do atuador do fecho da porta do veículo: Atuador + clipes/fixadores; Atuador + suporte(s) de montagem; Atuador + módulo remoto/sem chave; Atuador + hastes/ligações; Atuador + arnês de cabos/chicote; Apenas atuador; Kit de instalação completo; Outro
hu: Járműajtó zárjának aktuátorához való készlet tartalma: Működtető + rögzítők; Működtető + tartókonzol(ok); Működtető + távirányítós / kulcs nélküli modul; Működtető + rudak / rudazat; Működtető + kábelkorbács / csatlakozókábel; Csak működtető; Teljes beszerelőkészlet; Egyéb
zh-CN: 车辆门锁执行器套件内容: 执行器 + 卡扣/紧固件; 执行器 + 安装支架; 执行器 + 遥控/无钥匙模块; 执行器 + 拉杆/连杆; 执行器 + 线束/尾纤; 仅执行器; 完整安装套件; 其他
nb: Settinnhold for bildørlåsaktuator: Aktuator + klips/fester; Aktuator + monteringsbrakett(er); Aktuator + fjernkontroll-/nøkkelfri modul; Aktuator + stenger/stag; Aktuator + ledningsnett/pigtail; Kun aktuator; Komplett installasjonssett; Annet
ro-RO: Conținutul kitului de acționare a încuietorii ușii vehiculului: Actuator + cleme / elemente de fixare; Actuator + suport(uri) de montare; Actuator + modul telecomandă/keyless; Actuator + tije / articulații; Actuator + cablaj / pigtail; Doar actuator; Kit complet de instalare; Altele
pt-BR: Kit de atuador da fechadura da porta do veículo conteúdo: Atuador + clipes/fixadores; Atuador + suporte(s) de montagem; Atuador + módulo remoto/sem chave; Atuador + hastes/articulações; Atuador + chicote elétrico/conector pigtail; Apenas atuador; Kit de instalação completo; Outro
ru: Комплект привода замка двери автомобиля: Актуатор + зажимы/крепеж; Актуатор + монтажные кронштейны; Актуатор + модуль бесключевого доступа/ДУ; Актуатор + тяги/соединения; Актуатор + жгут проводов/разъем; Только актуатор; Полный установочный комплект; Другое
es: Contenido del kit actuador de cerradura de puerta del vehículo: Actuador + clips/sujetadores; Actuador + soportes de montaje; Actuador + módulo remoto/sin llave; Actuador + varillas/conexiones; Actuador + arnés de cableado/conector; Solo actuador; Kit de instalación completo; Otro
cs: Obsah balení sady ovládání zámku: Servomotor + spony/úchyty; Servomotor + montážní držák(y); Servomotor + dálkový/bezklíčový modul; Servomotor + táhla/spojení; Servomotor + kabelový svazek / konektor; Pouze servomotor; Kompletní instalační sada; Jiné
de: Inhalt des Sets für den Türschloss-Stellantrieb: Stellmotor + Clips/Befestigungen; Stellmotor + Montagehalterung(en); Stellmotor + Fernbedienungs-/Keyless-Modul; Stellmotor + Gestänge/Verbindungen; Stellmotor + Kabelbaum/Pigtail; Nur Stellmotor; Komplettes Installationskit; Sonstiges
pl: Zawartość zestawu siłownika zamka drzwi pojazdu: Siłownik + klipsy/elementy złączne; Siłownik + wsporniki montażowe; Siłownik + moduł zdalnego sterowania/bezkluczykowy; Siłownik + drążki/przekładnie; Siłownik + wiązka przewodów/wtyk; Tylko siłownik; Kompletny zestaw instalacyjny; Inne
it: Contenuto del kit attuatore della serratura per portiera del veicolo: Attuatore + clip/fissaggi; Attuatore + staffe di montaggio; Attuatore + modulo telecomando/keyless; Attuatore + aste/tiranti; Attuatore + cablaggio/cavo; Solo attuatore; Kit di installazione completo; Altro
da: Indhold i aktuatorsæt til bildørlås: Aktuator + clips/beslag; Aktuator + monteringsbeslag; Aktuator + fjernbetjenings-/nøglefrit modul; Aktuator + stænger/forbindelse; Aktuator + ledningsnet/pigtail; Kun aktuator; Komplet installationssæt; Andet
ko: 차량 도어 잠금장치 액추에이터 키트 구성품: 액추에이터 + 클립/패스너; 액추에이터 + 마운팅 브래킷; 액추에이터 + 원격/키리스 모듈; 액추에이터 + 로드/링키지; 액추에이터 + 배선 하네스/피그테일; 액추에이터 전용; 전체 설치 키트; 기타
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės durų spynos pavara rinkinys Turinys: Pavara + segtukai / tvirtinimo detalės; Pavara + tvirtinimo laikiklis (-iai); Pavara + nuotolinio / berakčio valdymo modulis; Pavara + traukės / jungtys; Pavara + laidų pynė / atšaka; Tik pavara; Pilnas montavimo rinkinys; Kita
zh-TW: 車門鎖致動器套件內容物: 致動器 + 夾子/緊固件; 致動器 + 安裝支架; 致動器 + 遙控/免鑰匙模組; 致動器 + 連桿; 致動器 + 線束/引線; 僅致動器; 完整安裝套件; 其他
fi: Ajoneuvon oven lukon toimilaitesarjan sisältö: Toimilaite sekä kiinnikkeet; Toimilaite ja asennuskiinnikkeet; Toimilaite ja kaukosäätö-/avaimeton moduuli; Toimilaite ja tangot/vivusto; Toimilaite ja johtosarja; Vain toimilaite; Täydellinen asennussarja; Muu
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта за задвижващ механизъм на автомобилна брава: Задвижващ механизъм + щипки/крепежни елементи; Задвижващ механизъм + монтажна скоба (скоби); Задвижващ механизъм + модул за дистанционно/безключово управление; Задвижващ механизъм + лостове/механизми; Задвижващ механизъм + кабелен сноп/накрайник; Само задвижващ механизъм; Пълен комплект за инсталиране; Друго
vi: Nội dung thiết bị truyền động khóa cửa xe: Cơ cấu chấp hành + kẹp/ốc vít; Cơ cấu chấp hành + giá đỡ; Cơ cấu chấp hành + mô-đun điều khiển từ xa/không chìa khóa; Cơ cấu chấp hành + thanh truyền/khớp nối; Cơ cấu chấp hành + bộ dây điện/dây nối; Chỉ có cơ cấu chấp hành; Bộ lắp đặt hoàn chỉnh; Khác
en: Vehicle door lock actuator kit contents: Actuator + clips/fasteners; Actuator + mounting bracket(s); Actuator + remote/keyless module; Actuator + rods/linkage; Actuator + wiring harness/pigtail; Actuator only; Complete installation kit; Other
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy ovládača zámku dverí vozidla: Ovládač + svorky/spojovací materiál; Ovládač + montážny držiak(y); Ovládač + modul na diaľkové/bezkľúčové odomykanie; Ovládač + tyčky/tiahla; Ovládač + káblový zväzok; Iba ovládač; Kompletná inštalačná súprava; Iné
ja: 車両ドアロックアクチュエーターキット内容: アクチュエーター + クリップ/ファスナー; アクチュエーター + マウントブラケット; アクチュエーター + リモコン/キーレスモジュール; アクチュエーター + ロッド/リンケージ; アクチュエーター + ワイヤーハーネス/ピッグテール; アクチュエーターのみ; 完全取り付けキット; その他
th: ตัวกระตุ้นการล็อคประตูรถยนต์ รายละเอียด: แอคชูเอเตอร์ + คลิป/ตัวยึด; แอคชูเอเตอร์ + ขายึด; แอคชูเอเตอร์ + โมดูลรีโมท/ไร้กุญแจ; แอคชูเอเตอร์ + ก้าน/จุดเชื่อมต่อ; แอคชูเอเตอร์ + ชุดสายไฟ/พิกเทล; แอคชูเอเตอร์เท่านั้น; ชุดเครื่องมือติดตั้งแบบครบชุด; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta sprožilca (aktuatorja) za zaklepanje vrat vozila: Aktuator in sponke/pritrdila; Aktuator in pritrdilni nosilci; Aktuator in modul za daljinsko/brezkontaktno upravljanje; Aktuator in palice/povezave; Aktuator in kabelski snop/kabel; Samo aktuator; Celoten komplet za namestitev; Drugo
hr-HR: Sadržaj kompleta aktuatora brave na vratima vozila: Aktuator + kopče/pričvršćivači; Aktuator + nosač(i) za montažu; Aktuator + modul za daljinsko otključavanje/otključavanje bez ključa; Aktuator + šipke/poluge; Aktuator + kabelski svežanj/kratki kabel (pigtail); Samo aktuator; Potpuni komplet za ugradnju; Ostalo
fr: Contenu du kit d’actionneur de serrure de porte du véhicule: Actionneur + clips/attaches; Actionneur + support(s) de montage; Actionneur + module à distance/sans clé; Actionneur + tiges/tringlerie; Actionneur + faisceau de câbles/raccord; Actionneur uniquement; Kit d’installation complet; Autre